Maine, session 132, LD963.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §4721, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Standard application form. To the extent practicable, a municipal housing
authority shall conform to the standard application form established pursuant to section
4722, subsection 1, paragraph II for subsidized housing applications. A municipal housing
authority shall require a contractor administering a subsidized housing program on the
authority’s behalf to use the standard application form.
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §4722, sub-§1, ¶GG, as amended by PL 2021, c. 322, §2, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (3) to read:
(3) Perform other functions and duties necessary for the proper administration of
the credit, including providing any necessary certifications and notices to taxpayers
and to the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of
Revenue Services containing information required by the State Tax Assessor
necessary for determining eligibility and the amount of the credit for each taxable
year; and.
Sec. 3. 30-A MRSA §4722, sub-§1, ¶GG, as amended by PL 2021, c. 322, §2, is
further amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
Rules adopted under this paragraph are routine technical rules.;
Sec. 4. 30-A MRSA §4722, sub-§1, ¶HH, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 322, §3, is
amended to read:
HH. Provide the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
housing matters copies of any reports required to be submitted to the United States
Department of the Treasury or the Governor regarding the administration of the
emergency rental assistance programs established by Section 501 of Division N of the
federal Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 and Section 3201(a) of the federal
American Rescue Plan Act of 2021. Copies of any reports required to be submitted to
the United States Department of the Treasury or the Governor must be submitted to the
joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over housing matters
no later than 7 days after the reports are submitted to the United States Department of
the Treasury or the Governor. If no such reports are required to be submitted to the
United States Department of the Treasury or the Governor, the Maine State Housing
Authority shall submit, beginning January 15, 2022 and annually thereafter, to the joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over housing matters a report
on any rental assistance distributed by the Maine State Housing Authority.; and
Sec. 5. 30-A MRSA §4722, sub-§1, ¶II is enacted to read:
II. Develop a standard application form for municipal housing authorities to use for
subsidized housing applications.
Sec. 6. Standard subsidized housing application form. By December 1, 2025,
the Maine State Housing Authority shall develop a standard application form in accordance
with the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 30-A, section 4722, subsection 1, paragraph II.
Page 1 - 132LR1303(01)